src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pl.aff
SFX G   e          cemu     le 
SFX G   e          ca       le 
SFX G   e          c        le 
SFX G   e          ce       le 
SFX G   e          cej      le 
SFX G             j cy      [ao]rze 
SFX G             j cym     [ao]rze 
SFX G             j cymi    [ao]rze 
SFX G             j cych    [ao]rze 
SFX G             j cego    [ao]rze 
SFX G             j cemu    [ao]rze 
SFX G             j ca      [ao]rze 
SFX G             j c       [ao]rze 
SFX G             j ce      [ao]rze 
SFX G             j cej     [ao]rze 
SFX G   ze         cy       [^ao]rze 
SFX G   ze         cym      [^ao]rze 
SFX G   ze         cymi     [^ao]rze 
SFX G   ze         cych     [^ao]rze 
SFX G   ze         cego     [^ao]rze 
SFX G   ze         cemu     [^ao]rze 
SFX G   ze         ca       [^ao]rze 
SFX G   ze         c        [^ao]rze 
SFX G   ze         ce       [^ao]rze 
SFX G   ze         cej      [^ao]rze 
SFX G             j cy      [bfmnpw]i 
SFX G             j cym     [bfmnpw]i 
SFX G             j cymi    [bfmnpw]i 
SFX G             j cych    [bfmnpw]i 
SFX G             j cego    [bfmnpw]i 
SFX G             j cemu    [bfmnpw]i 
SFX G             j ca      [bfmnpw]i 
SFX G             j c       [bfmnpw]i 
SFX G             j ce      [bfmnpw]i 
SFX G             j cej     [bfmnpw]i 
SFX G              s cy        
SFX G              s cym       
SFX G              s cymi      
SFX G              s cych      
SFX G              s cego      
SFX G              s cemu      
SFX G              s ca        
SFX G              s c         
SFX G              s ce        
SFX G              s cej       
SFX G   e         os cy     [^j]e  
SFX G   e         os cym    [^j]e  
SFX G   e         os cymi   [^j]e  
SFX G   e         os cych   [^j]e  
SFX G   e         os cego   [^j]e  
SFX G   e         os cemu   [^j]e  
SFX G   e         os ca     [^j]e  
SFX G   e         os c      [^j]e  
SFX G   e         os ce     [^j]e  
SFX G   e         os cej    [^j]e  
SFX G            od cy       
SFX G            od cym      
SFX G            od cymi     
SFX G            od cych     
SFX G            od cego     
SFX G            od cemu     
SFX G            od ca       
SFX G            od c        
SFX G            od ce       
SFX G            od cej      
SFX G             j cy      [uy] 
SFX G             j cym     [uy] 
SFX G             j cymi    [uy] 
SFX G             j cych    [uy] 
SFX G             j cego    [uy] 
SFX G             j cemu    [uy] 
SFX G             j ca      [uy] 
SFX G             j c       [uy] 
SFX G             j ce      [uy] 
SFX G             j cej     [uy] 
SFX G    u        ol cy     k u 
SFX G    u        ol cym    k u 
SFX G    u        ol cymi   k u 
SFX G    u        ol cych   k u 
SFX G    u        ol cego   k u 
SFX G    u        ol cemu   k u 
SFX G    u        ol ca     k u 
SFX G    u        ol c      k u 
SFX G    u        ol ce     k u 
SFX G    u        ol cej    k u 
SFX G             z cy      [^e]  
SFX G             z cym     [^e]  
SFX G             z cymi    [^e]  
SFX G             z cych    [^e]  
SFX G             z cego    [^e]  
SFX G             z cemu    [^e]  
SFX G             z ca      [^e]  
SFX G             z c       [^e]  
SFX G             z ce      [^e]  
SFX G             z cej     [^e]  
SFX G   e         oz cy     ie  
SFX G   e         oz cym    ie  
SFX G   e         oz cymi   ie  
SFX G   e         oz cych   ie  
SFX G   e         oz cego   ie  
SFX G   e         oz cemu   ie  
SFX G   e         oz ca     ie  
SFX G   e         oz c      ie  
SFX G   e         oz ce     ie  
SFX G   e         oz cej    ie  
SFX G             z cy      le  
SFX G             z cym     le  
SFX G             z cymi    le  
SFX G             z cych    le  
SFX G             z cego    le  
SFX G             z cemu    le  
SFX G             z ca      le  
SFX G             z c       le  
SFX G             z ce      le  
SFX G             z cej     le  
MAP 8
MAP a 
MAP c 
MAP e 
MAP l 
MAP n 
MAP o u
MAP s 
MAP z  
REP 64
REP   zi
REP   eu
REP   ci
REP   d 
REP   d 
REP   dz
REP c dz
REP ch h
REP ci  
REP cz czy
REP d   
REP d  dzi
REP d   
REP dz  
REP dzi d 
REP edzil  dzi 
REP   em
REP   en
REP ei eja
REP eja ei
REP em  
REP en  
REP eu  
REP h ch
REP he ch 
REP  i  
REP ii ija
REP ija ii
REP iosc o  
REP ise si 
REP loz  os
REP ni  
REP  i  
REP   ni
REP   o 
REP o   
REP oi oja
REP oja oi
REP   om
REP om  
REP   on
REP on  
REP ru kr 
REP   rz
REP rz  
REP rz sz
REP scia  ci 
REP   si
REP si  
REP si    
REP s sn 
REP sz  
REP sz rz
REP tro rot
REP u y
REP wu wy
REP yi yja
REP yja yi
REP zal rza 
REP zekac rzeka 
REP zi  
REP zl az 
REP z  n
REP z rz
